portugues.dict
abreviar/XYcBMD
acalorar/XYB
acelerar/XYScMDnB
acertar/XYSB
adequar/YcdBvS
afincar/XYMB
afortunar/XYB
alentar/XYB
amar/XYDnB
amparar/XYSMDB
apaixonar/XYnSvB
aplicar/XYcnvB
aprofundar/XYcMB
aproximar/XYcBRv
arrebatar/XYMDnB
arrepender/XYMB
arrojar/XYMDB
atabalhoar/XYBcM
capital/ppjit
charme/pw
chocar/XYnB
circular/mpXYBdcDn
confiar/XYSBv
continuar/XYScDB
declarar/XYcDnvB
demorar/XYB
desajeitar/XYB
descansar/XYB
descuidar/XYB
desenvolver/XYMnuB
desmazelar/XYB
despreocupar/XYcB
devotar/XYcMB
ditoso/pmjf
educar/XYRScDvB
endiabrar/XYB
enternecer/XYMDB
errar/XYnB
especular/XYBcD
exagerar/XYcBD
extrudir/XYDB
fatigar/XYDnB
fundamentar/XYcnB
garantir/XYDB
inchar/XYcMSB
inspirar/XYcDvB
inverter/XYvB
marcar/XYcDnBS
modular/pDXYBdcnD
obstinar/XYBc
ousar/XYB
perpetuar/XYcBD
presumir/XYDB
reconhecer/XYMDvB
regular/pdImXYBcMSDv
resignar/XYcnvB
resumir/XYDB
sagrar/XYcDB
sentir/YMPB
sino/py
sossegar/XYDB
subordinar/XYcDnvB
suportar/XYcvB
temperar/XYSMDnvB
tolerar/XYnvdB
vincar/XYB
virtual/pmdj
disfarçar/XYB
esforçar/XYDB
